Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB257.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Carbon Monoxide Alarm Standards in Lodging Establishments Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Approved carbon monoxide alarm." As defined in section 2 of the act of December 18, 2013 (P.L.1229, No.121), known as the Carbon Monoxide Alarm Standards Act."Fossil fuel." As defined in section 2 of the Carbon Monoxide Alarm Standards Act."Installed." A carbon monoxide alarm that is hardwired into 1234567891011121314151617 the electrical wiring, directly plugged into an electrical outlet without a switch, other than a circuit breaker, or, if the alarm is battery powered, attached to the wall or ceiling of a lodging establishment or a unit, in accordance with the Standard for the Installation of Carbon Monoxide (CO) Detection and Warning Equipment (NFPA 720)."Lodging establishment."(1) Any of the following:(i) a hotel, motel, inn, guest house or other structure which is held out by any means, including advertising, license, registration with an innkeepers' group, convention listing association, travel publication or similar association or with a government agency, as being available to provide overnight lodging or use of facility space for consideration to persons seeking temporary accommodation;(ii) a place which advertises beds, sanitary facilities or other space for a temporary period to members of the public-at-large; or(iii) a place recognized as a hostelry.(2) The term includes any portion of a facility that is devoted to an individual who pays consideration to occupy one or more units as an established permanent residence. The term does not include a college or university student residence hall."Operational." Working and in service."Unit." A room or a suite of two or more rooms of a lodging establishment that are occupied, leased for occupation or intended or designed to be occupied either as overnight lodging, temporary accommodation or as a permanent residence.20250SB0257PN0212 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Administration.Nothing in this act is intended to modify the authority and responsibilities of the Department of Labor and Industry under the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act.Section 4. Carbon monoxide alarm requirements.(a) Lodging establishment.--A lodging establishment that uses a fossil-fuel-burning heater, fireplace or appliance or has an attached garage must have an operational, centrally located and approved carbon monoxide alarm installed in the vicinity of the fossil-fuel-burning heater, fireplace or appliance and in every unit that is located on the same story as the fossil-fuel-burning heater, fireplace or appliance or attached garage within 18 months of the effective date of this subsection.(b) Maintenance, repair or replacement.--The owner of a lodging establishment is responsible for providing for the maintenance, repair or replacement of an approved carbon monoxide alarm and the alarm's batteries in the lodging establishment.Section 5. Enforcement.Willful failure to install or maintain an operational approved carbon monoxide alarm required under this act is a summary offense punishable by a fine of up to $50.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0257PN0212 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425